Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-374
Cost of patient care; hearing; appeal.

Any patient or relative aggrieved by a determination of ability to pay may request a hearing before the department. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to govern the conduct of such hearings. The department may appoint an examiner who shall have power to preside at such hearing, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and take testimony and shall report the same to the department. Such hearings shall be held in the county in which the person requesting the hearing resides, if such person so requests, in which event it shall be the duty of the county board to attend such hearing. The department shall deliver the decision within sixty days after the conclusion of the hearing. Any patient or relative aggrieved by a decision following a hearing may appeal such decision, and such appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 12, p. 3054;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 183;

Laws 1989, LB 32, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 794.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.